New York, session 2025-2026, S7118.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 Raymond Ruckel, a tier VI member of the New York state and local employ- 3 ees' retirement system employed by the Rockland county sheriff's office 4 correction division and who was employed as a full-time employee with 5 Clarkstown Central School District from August 1, 1990 through December 6 1, 1990 and who, through no fault of his own, did not become a member of 7 the New York state and local employees' retirement system on August 1, 8 1990 when he became eligible for membership in such system, shall be 9 deemed to have a date of membership with the New York state and local 10 employees' retirement system of August 1, 1990 if he shall file an 11 application therefore with the state comptroller within one year of the 12 effective date of this act. Upon the receipt of such application, 13 Raymond Ruckel shall be granted tier IV status in the New York state and 14 local employees' retirement system and shall be eligible for all the 15 rights and benefits thereof. 16 § 2. All past service costs of implementing the provisions of this act 17 shall be borne by Clarkstown Central School District, and there shall be 18 no refund of member contributions to Raymond Ruckel. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would grant Tier 4 status in the New York State and Local Employees' Retirement System to Raymond Ruckel, a current Tier 6 member employed by Rockland County, by changing their date of membership to August 1, 1990, their first date of employment with the Clarkstown EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03470-02-5 S. 7118 2 Central School District. There will be no refund of member contrib- utions. If this bill is enacted during the 2025 Legislative Session, we antic- ipate that there will be an increase of approximately $8,000 in the annual contributions of Rockland County for the fiscal year ending March 31, 2026. In future years this cost will vary as the billing rates and salary of Raymond Ruckel change. In addition to the annual contributions discussed above, there will be an immediate past service cost of approximately $65,100 which will be borne by Clarkstown Central School District as a one-time payment. This estimate assumes that payment will be made on February 1, 2026. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2024 was used in measuring the impact of the proposed change, the same data used in the April 1, 2024 actuari- al valuation. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2024 Report of the Actuary and the 2024 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2024 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The Market Assets and GASB Disclosures are found in the March 31, 2024 New York State and Local Retirement System Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the proposed change nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the professional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated March 27, 2025, and intended for use only during the 2025 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note No. 2025-102. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System, I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applica- ble Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actuaries, of which I am a member.